Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-112
Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Cash Fund is created for the purpose of funding the program set forth in section 37-111. The fund shall consist of any money credited to the fund pursuant to section 60-3,163.02. The fund may also receive gifts, bequests, grants, or other contributions or donations from public or private entities. The state investment officer shall invest any money in the fund available for investment pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2021, LB166, § 10;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 2.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.